Massachusetts, session 194th, S2714.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a special legislative commission established pursuant to
Section _ of chapter _ of the General Laws to study cases of denial of rights and services of
disabled persons with disabilities as well as cases that have resolved.
SECTION 2. (a) The commission shall consist of: The chairs of the joint committee on
children, families and persons with disabilities, who shall serve as co-chairs; the executive
director of the Massachusetts Office on Disability, the attorney general or a designee; three
persons to be appointed by the governor, a representative of the Disability Law Center, a
representative of the Disability Policy Consortium, a representative of the Massachusetts
Statewide Independent Living Council, a representative of the Massachusetts Coalition of
Families and Advocates, a representative from the Massachusetts Commission Against
Discrimination, two advocates who are disabled with a service animal, and a representative of
of 2

the Arc of Massachusetts. The commission shall meet not less than 6 times and shall hold not
less than 2 public hearings.
(b) The commission shall study and report on: (i) The volume of disability rights denial
cases submitted to the Massachusetts Commission Against Discrimination, (ii) the volume of
disability rights denial cases submitted to the U.S. Department of Justice and their impacts on the
disability community, (iii) the effectiveness of the enforcement of disability rights in the
Commonwealth within the last five years, and (iv) education of disability rights awareness.
(c) The commission shall submit a report with recommendations, including legislation or
regulations necessary to carry out such recommendations, to the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate, the joint committee on children, families, and persons with
disabilities, and the senate and house committees on ways and means not later than August 1,
2027.
of 2